Missouri, session 2026, HB2220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 227.675, to read as follows:
227.675. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Department of Transportation Fiber Network Expansion Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri highways and transportation commission;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of transportation.
3. The commission may enter into public-private partnerships with private
broadband internet service providers to expand and further develop the department's
fiber network.
4. The commission shall prioritize expansion and development under this section
in unserved areas and underserved areas, as such terms are defined in section 620.2450.
5. The commission shall use a competitive procurement process to form public-
private partnerships under this section. The commission shall publish a public notice of
the commission's request for proposals, including any deadline for submission of such
proposals, which shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in:
(1) A newspaper of general circulation in the city where the proposed project is
located;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2220 2
(2) At least one technology industry trade publication that is nationally
distributed; and
(3) Such other publications or manner as the commission may determine.
6. As part of a contract award under this section, the private partnering entity
may use the excess fiber capacity to provide internet services as long as the services
provided meet the state minimum standard for broadband set by the department of
economic development.
7. The commission may promulgate any rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔